my_app/dictionaries/hunspell-la/la_LA.aff
SFX B o       erent           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erentque        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erentqve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erentne         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erentve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erentue         [^ei]o      
SFX B o       e               [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eque            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eqve            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ene             [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eve             [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eue             [^ei]o      
SFX B o       ite             [^ei]o    
SFX B o       iteque          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       iteqve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itene           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       iteve           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       iteue           [^ei]o      
SFX B o       ito             [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itoque          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itoqve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itone           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itove           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itoue           [^ei]o      
SFX B o       itote           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itoteque        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itoteqve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itotene         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itoteve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itoteue         [^ei]o      
SFX B o       unto            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       vnto            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       untoque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       vntoqve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       untone          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       untove          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       untoue          [^ei]o      
SFX B o       ere             [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ereque          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ereqve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erene           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ereve           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ereue           [^ei]o      
SFX B o       endum           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endvm           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endumque        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endvmqve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endumne         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endvmne         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endumve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endumue         [^ei]o      
SFX B o       endvmve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endi            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endique         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endiqve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endine          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endive          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endiue          [^ei]o      
SFX B o       endo            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endoque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endoqve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endone          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endove          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endoue          [^ei]o      
SFX B o       undum           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       vndvm           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       undumque        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       vndvmqve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       undumne         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       vndvmne         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       undumve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       undumue         [^ei]o      
SFX B o       vndvmve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       undi            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       vndi            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       undique         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       vndiqve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       undine          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       vndine          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       undive          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       undiue          [^ei]o      
SFX B o       vndive          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       undo            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       vndo            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       undoque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       vndoqve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       undone          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       vndone          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       undove          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       undoue          [^ei]o      
SFX B o       vndove          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ens             [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ensque          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ensqve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ensne           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ensve           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ensue           [^ei]o      
SFX B o       entem           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entemque        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entemqve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entemne         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entemve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entemue         [^ei]o      
SFX B o       entis           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entisque        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entisqve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entisne         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entisve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entisue         [^ei]o      
SFX B o       enti            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entique         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entiqve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entine          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entive          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entiue          [^ei]o      
SFX B o       ente            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       enteque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       enteqve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entene          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       enteve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       enteue          [^ei]o      
SFX B o       entes           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entesque        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entesqve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entesne         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entesve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entesue         [^ei]o      
SFX B o       entium          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entivm          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entiumque       [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entivmqve       [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entiumne        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entivmne        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entiumve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entiumue        [^ei]o      
SFX B o       entivmve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entum          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entvm          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entumque       [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entvmqve       [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entumne        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entvmne        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entumve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entumue        [^ei]o      
SFX B o       entvmve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entibus         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entibvs         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entibusque      [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entibvsqve      [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entibusne       [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entibvsne       [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entibusve       [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entibusue       [^ei]o      
SFX B o       entibvsve       [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entia           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entiaque        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entiaqve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entiane         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entiave         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entiaue         [^ei]o      
SFX B o       or              [^ei]o    
SFX B o       orque           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       orqve           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       orne            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       orve            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       orue            [^ei]o      
SFX B o       eris            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erisque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erisqve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erisne          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erisve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erisue          [^ei]o      
SFX B o       itur            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itvr            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       iturque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itvrqve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       iturne          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itvrne          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       iturve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       iturue          [^ei]o      
SFX B o       itvrve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       imur            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       imvr            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       imurque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       imvrqve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       imurne          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       imvrne          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       imurve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       imurue          [^ei]o      
SFX B o       imvrve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       imini           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       iminique        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       iminiqve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       iminine         [^ei]o    
